District of Columbia statutes.
10-1221.15

Federal recovery act reimbursement requirement.

If the District or the Authority receive reimbursement, subsidy, or TIF debt service relief in excess of the funds required by the bond covenant authorized by this subchapter, pursuant to the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, approved February 17, 2009 (123 Stat. 115; 26 U.S.C. § 1 , note), the revenue and relief shall be credited to the District and shall be deposited in the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-163, § 113b
as added Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-78, § 3(e), 56 DCR 6959
American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, 123 Stat. 115, 111 P.L. 5.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(e) of New Convention Center Hotel Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-186, August 12, 2009, 56 DCR 6967).